Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2505
Commission; members; compensation; expenses.

The members of the commission shall not receive compensation for their services but shall be reimbursed for such necessary expenses and mileage as may be incurred in the performance of their duties with reimbursement for mileage to be made at the rate provided in section 81-1176. The county board shall provide sufficient funds in order that such commission may function as set forth in sections 23-2501 to 23-2516.

Laws 1971, LB 921, § 5;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 31;

Laws 1996, LB 1011, § 14.